Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.320

Infraction—Dismissal, when.

The administrative law judge shall dismiss the notice of infraction at any time upon written notification from the department that the contractor named in the notice of infraction was registered, without suspension, at the time the work was performed.

[ 2001 c 159 s 11; 1993 c 454 s 11; 1986 c 197 s 9; 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 13.]

NOTES:

Finding—1993 c 454: See note following RCW 18.27.010.

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: See note following RCW 18.27.200.